Montana, session 2025, HB757.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Prioritization of cultural and aesthetic projects grant awards -- criteria. After the
cultural and aesthetic projects advisory committee provided for in 2-15-1521 has reviewed the applications to
ensure compliance and determine whether the application meets the committee's criteria for funding, the
committee shall rank the projects by two criteria as follows:
(1) the status of an applicant's previous grant awards, for which:
(a) first priority will be given to qualified applicants who have not previously received an award;
(b) second priority will be given to applicants who have received one grant award in the previous
three funding cycles;
(c) third priority will be given to applicants who have received two grant awards in the previous
three funding cycles; and
(d) fourth priority will be given to applicants who have received three grant awards in the previous
three funding cycles; and
(2) the size of an applicant's annual operating budget, for which:
(a) first priority will be given to applicants whose total annual operating budget is less than
$99,999;
(b) second priority will be given to applicants whose total annual operating budget ranges between
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 757
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 757
$100,000 and $249,999;
(c) third priority will be given to applicants whose total annual operating budget ranges between
$250,000 and $499,999; and
(d) fourth priority will be given to applicants whose total annual operating budget is equal to or
greater than $500,000.
(3) Between each funding cycle, the committee, in consultation with the budget director, shall
increase the budget limits established in subsection (2) to account for inflation.
Section 2. Acquisition of federal system for award management number. Grant applicants for a
cultural or aesthetic project whose total program budget does not exceed $100,000 and who do not receive or
use federal funds to operate may request a waiver from the committee for the requirement to obtain a federal
system for award management number, or SAMs number, if complying with the requirement would be
burdensome. The committee may not unreasonably withhold the waiver.
Section 3. Section 22-2-302, MCA, is amended to read:
"22-2-302. Advisory committee -- powers and duties. (1) The Subject to [section 1], the cultural
and aesthetic projects advisory committee provided for in 2-15-1521 shall review all proposals for cultural and
aesthetic project grants before they are submitted to the legislature.
(2) Consistent with the rules adopted in accordance with 22-2-303, the committee shall make
recommendations to the legislature on each proposal submitted to the committee.
(3) The committee's recommendations to the legislature are advisory only.
(4) The committee shall present its recommendations to the appropriations committee of the
legislature by the 15th day of any regular legislative session."
Section 4. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 and 2] are intended to be codified as an integral
part of Title 22, chapter 2, part 3, and the provisions of Title 22, chapter 2, part 3, apply to [sections 1 and 2].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 757
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 757, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 757
INTRODUCED BY J. FITZPATRICK, M. VINTON, S. ROSENZWEIG, J. KASSMIER, E. BOLDMAN, J. ESP, P.
TUSS
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING CULTURAL AND AESTHETIC PROJECTS GRANTS; PROVIDING CRITERIA
BY WHICH THE CULTURAL AND AESTHETIC PROJECTS ADVISORY COMMITTEE SHALL PRIORITIZE
APPLICATIONS FOR GRANTS; PROVIDING AN EXCEPTION ON THE REQUIREMENT TO OBTAIN A
FEDERAL SYSTEM FOR AWARD MANAGEMENT NUMBER; AND AMENDING SECTION 22-2-302, MCA.”